Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1737.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Navajo Route 8009; exemption A. The sum of $800,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo division of transportation for grading, draining, graveling and stabilizing the roadway along Navajo Route 8009. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.